local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
    <pardef n="huvud__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="koncept__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bageri__n">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ernas</l> 
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r> 
        </p> 
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>erna</l> 
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
        </p> 
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ers</l> 
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r> 
        </p> 
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>er</l> 
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
        </p> 
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ets</l> 
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r> 
        </p> 
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>et</l> 
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
        </p> 
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>
          <l>s</l> 
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r> 
        </p> 
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l/> 
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
        </p> 
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kvarter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grund__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="film"><i>film</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="videofilm"><i>videofilm</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barnfilm"><i>barnfilm</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvdfilm"><i>dvdfilm</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pippifilm"><i>pippifilm</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="disneyfilm"><i>disneyfilm</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abonnemangspris"><i>abonnemangspris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nypris"><i>nypris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abonnemangspris"><i>abonnemangspris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abonnentpris"><i>abonnentpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="à-pris"><i>à-pris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bensinpris"><i>bensinpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elpris"><i>elpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="extrapris"><i>extrapris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grejsimojs"><i>grejsimojs</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="harts"><i>harts</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jämförpris"><i>jämförpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalkylpris"><i>kalkylpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ketonharts"><i>ketonharts</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konsumentpris"><i>konsumentpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lockpris"><i>lockpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lågpris"><i>lågpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ockerpris"><i>ockerpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pris"><i>pris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tomtpris"><i>tomtpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vax"><i>vax</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="överpris"><i>överpris</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bageri"><i>bageri</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batteri"><i>batteri</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bryggeri"><i>bryggeri</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fett"><i>fett</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galleri"><i>galleri</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gift"><i>gift</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grund"><i>grund</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="huvud"><i>huvud</i><par n="huvud__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imperativ"><i>imperativ</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koncept"><i>koncept</i><par n="koncept__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konditori"><i>konditori</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvarter"><i>kvarter</i><par n="kvarter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lotteri"><i>lotteri</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paraply"><i>paraply</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parti"><i>parti</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ras"><i>ras</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="salt"><i>salt</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vad"><i>vad</i><par n="grund__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vin"><i>vin</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="våldtäkt"><i>våldtäkt</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
